Connecticut, session 2026, SB00349.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 7-313r of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Not later than [July 1, 2023] October 1, 2026, and annually
thereafter, the State Treasurer, in consultation with the Connecticut
State Firefighters Association, shall submit a report to (1) the advisory
committee established pursuant to section 7-313q, and (2) the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to labor and public employees, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a, on the status of the firefighters cancer relief
account established pursuant to section 7-313h and the firefighters
cancer relief [program] programs established pursuant to [section]
sections 7-313j and 7-313p. Such report shall include [(1)] (A) the balance
of the account, [(2)] (B) the projected and actual [participation in the
program] expenditures for each program, and [(3)] (C) the
[demographic information of each firefighter who receives benefits
pursuant to such program, including gender, age, town of residence and
income level] projected and actual sources of income for the account.

Senate Bill No. 349
(b) If the State Treasurer determines that the firefighters cancer relief
account is approaching insolvency, the State Treasurer shall provide
notice to (1) all municipalities currently providing compensation
pursuant to section 7-313p, (2) the Governor's office, (3) the Workers'
Compensation Commission, and (4) the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and
public employees.
Sec. 2. Section 7-313g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
For purposes of this section and sections 3-123, 7-313h to [7-313k] 7-
313j, inclusive, and 29-303, "firefighter" shall include any (1) local fire
marshal, deputy fire marshal, fire investigator, fire inspector and such
other classes of inspectors and investigators for whom the State Fire
Marshal and the Codes and Standards Committee, acting jointly, have
adopted minimum standards of qualification pursuant to section 29-298;
and (2) uniformed member of a paid municipal, state or volunteer fire
department or of the Connecticut Airport Authority, the Tweed-New
Haven Airport and any entity that contracts with the Tweed-New
Haven Airport Authority.
Sec. 3. Section 7-313k of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
October 1, 2026)
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-83 2 of 2